Nebraska, session 109, LB689.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-930, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-930 (1)(a) A member who experiences a separation from service
with the member's employer but has not submitted a retirement application
or a request for distribution pursuant to section 79-955, or received a
retirement benefit, disability retirement benefit, or distribution
pursuant to section 79-955, from the retirement system, may return to
work as a temporary employee, substitute employee, or volunteer for any
employer participating in the retirement system. Such an employee:
(i) Shall be deemed to have incurred a termination for purposes of
sections 79-921, 79-932, 79-933.02 to 79-933.06, and 79-933.08;
(ii) Shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination for purposes
of sections 79-933, 79-951, and 79-955, and shall not be eligible to
receive a retirement benefit, disability retirement benefit, or
distribution pursuant to section 79-955, from the retirement system,
until the member incurs a termination of employment as described in
subdivision (45) of section 79-902; and
(iii) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this section,
shall not be eligible to contribute to the retirement system pursuant to
section 79-958 or accrue service credit in the retirement system pursuant
to section 79-927.
(b)(i) A member as described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section
who becomes a regular employee for an employer participating in the
retirement system shall immediately begin making contributions pursuant
to section 79-958 on all compensation paid by such employer and accrue
service credit pursuant to section 79-927 for all such service performed
for such employer, including any work as a temporary employee or
substitute employee.
(ii) A member as described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section who
has not established eligibility as a regular employee at another employer
shall not make contributions pursuant to section 79-958 on all
-2-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
compensation paid by such employer nor accrue service credit pursuant to
section 79-927 for work performed by the member as a temporary employee
or substitute employee for such employer.
(c) Work performed while the member is not contributing to the
retirement system pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall
not accrue service credit in the retirement system pursuant to section
79-927 and cannot be purchased as service credit under sections 79-933.03
to 79-933.06 and 79-933.08.
(2)(a) A member who experiences a separation from service with the
member's employer and has submitted a retirement application or a request
for distribution pursuant to section 79-955, or received a retirement
benefit, disability retirement benefit, or distribution pursuant to
section 79-955, from the retirement system, shall not be deemed to have
incurred a termination of employment if the member subsequently returns
to work for any employer participating in the retirement system within
one hundred eighty days after separating from service, unless such work
is limited to:
(i) Intermittent work as a volunteer or substitute employee. For
purposes of this subsection:
(A) Intermittent work means work provided on a day-to-day basis that
is not greater than eight days of work during a calendar month; and
(B) Day of work means any length of work as a volunteer or
substitute employee provided during a single calendar day; or
(ii) Work as authorized by, and performed in accordance with,
section 79-920.
(b) The one-hundred-eighty-day period begins on the later of:
(i) The date the member experienced a bona fide separation from
service of all employment with all employers participating in the
retirement system; or
(ii) The date the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems
receives the member's retirement application or request for distribution
-3-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
pursuant to section 79-955.
(c)(i) A member may seek a determination from the director of the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems that it has been at least
one hundred eighty days since the member satisfied the requirements
described in this subsection. The director shall make such determination
if the member produces clear and convincing evidence that is received by
the director within forty-five days after the later of:
(A) The date the member experienced a bona fide separation of
service of all employment with all employers participating in the
retirement system; or
(B) The date the member's retirement application or request for
distribution pursuant to section 79-955 is received by the Nebraska
Public Employees Retirement Systems.
(ii) A member may appeal the director's determination to the board
within thirty days after receiving such determination.
(iii) The board's determination on the appeal shall be final and
shall not be appealable to any court.
Sec. 2. Section 79-992, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-992 (1) A member who has five years or more of creditable
service, excluding years of prior service acquired pursuant to section
79-990, 79-991, 79-994, 79-995, or 79-997, and who terminates his or her
employment may elect to leave his or her contributions in the retirement
system, in which event he or she shall receive a retirement allowance at
normal retirement age based on the annuity earned to the date of such
termination of employment. Such member may elect to receive a retirement
allowance at early retirement age if such member retires at an early
retirement date. Such annuity shall be adjusted in accordance with
section 79-9,100. Upon termination of employment, except on account of
retirement, a member shall be entitled to receive refunds as follows: (a)
An amount equal to the accumulated contributions to the retirement system
-4-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
by the member; and (b) any contributions made to a previously existing
system which were refundable under the terms of that system. Any member
receiving a refund of contributions shall thereby forfeit and relinquish
all accrued rights in the retirement system including all accumulated
creditable service, except that if any member who has withdrawn his or
her contributions as provided in this section reenters the service of the
district and again becomes a member of the retirement system, he or she
may restore any or all money previously received by him or her as a
refund, including the interest on the amount of the restored refund for
the period of his or her absence from the district's service as
determined using the interest rate for interest on such restored refunds,
and he or she shall then again receive credit for that portion of service
which the restored money represents. Such restoration may be made as the
board may direct until September 1, 2024, and as the retirement board may
direct beginning September 1, 2024, through direct payments to the system
or on an installment basis pursuant to a binding irrevocable payroll
deduction authorized between the member and the school district over a
period of not to exceed five years from the date of reemployment.
Interest on delayed payments shall be at the rate of interest for
determining interest on delayed payments by members to the retirement
system. Creditable service may be purchased only in one-tenth-year
increments, starting with the most recent years' salary.
(2) Except as provided in section 79-992.01:
(a)(i) A retired member, or a member described in subdivision (2)(c)
or (d) of this subsection, who returns to employment as or again becomes
an employee of the school district shall again participate in the
retirement system as a new member and shall make contributions to the
retirement system commencing upon reemployment as an employee.
(ii) The retirement annuity of a retired member who returns to
employment with the school district shall continue to be paid by the
retirement system. A retired member who returns to employment as an
-5-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
employee of the school district shall receive creditable service only for
service performed after his or her return to employment and in no event
shall creditable service which accrues or the compensation paid to the
member after such return to employment after retirement increase the
amount of the member's original retirement annuity;
(b) Upon termination of employment of the reemployed member, the
member shall receive in addition to the retirement annuity which
commenced at the time of the previous retirement (i) if the member has
accrued five years or more of creditable service after his or her return
to employment, excluding years of prior service acquired pursuant to
section 79-990, 79-991, 79-994, 79-995, or 79-997, a retirement annuity
as provided in section 79-999 or 79-9,100, as applicable, calculated
solely on the basis of creditable service and final average compensation
accrued and earned after the member's return to employment after his or
her original retirement, and as adjusted to reflect any payment in other
than the normal form or (ii) if the member has not accrued five years or
more of creditable service after his or her return to employment, a
refund equal to the member's accumulated contributions which were
credited to the member after the member's return to employment. In no
event shall the member's creditable service which accrued prior to a
previous retirement be considered as part of the member's creditable
service after his or her return to employment for any purpose of the
Class V School Employees Retirement Act;
(c) A member who experiences a separation from service but has not
submitted a retirement application or request for distribution pursuant
to this section or as described in subdivision (32) of section 79-978, or
received a retirement benefit, disability retirement benefit, or refund
may return to work as a temporary employee, substitute employee, or
volunteer. Such a temporary employee, substitute employee, or volunteer:
(i) Shall be deemed to have incurred a termination of employment for
purposes of section 79-991;
-6-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
(ii) Shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination of
employment for purposes of this section or section 79-992.01, 79-9,105,
or 79-9,106, or for any other purposes under the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act, and shall not be eligible to receive a retirement
benefit, disability retirement benefit, or distribution pursuant to this
section, until the member incurs a termination of employment as described
in subdivision (42) of section 79-978; and
(iii) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(a)(i) of this section,
shall not be eligible to contribute to the retirement system pursuant to
section 79-9,113 or earn membership service credit in the retirement
system as described in subdivision (23) of section 79-978; and
(d)(i) A member who experiences a separation from service and has
submitted a retirement application or request for distribution pursuant
to this section or as described in subdivision (32) of section 79-978, or
received a retirement benefit, disability retirement benefit, or
distribution, shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination of
employment if the member subsequently returns to work for the district
within one hundred eighty days after separating from service, unless such
work is limited to:
(A) Bona fide unpaid voluntary service;
(B) Work performed as a substitute employee on an intermittent
basis; or
(C) Work as a temporary employee following a bona fide separation of
service of not less than thirty calendar days and which is provided to
accomplish a specific purpose or task for a limited period not to exceed
one year.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (2)(d) of this section:
(A) Intermittent basis means work provided on a day-to-day basis
that is not greater than eight days of work during a calendar month; and
(B) Day of work means any length of work as a substitute employee
provided during a single calendar day.
-7-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
(iii) The one-hundred-eighty-day period described in subdivision (2)
(d)(i) of this section begins on the later of:
(A) The date the member experienced a bona fide separation from
service of all employment as an employee with the school district; or
(B) The date the board receives the member's retirement application
or request for distribution as described in subdivision (32) of section
79-978.
(iv) A member may seek a determination from the administrator that
it has been at least one hundred eighty days since the member satisfied
the requirements described in this subdivision (2)(d). The administrator
shall make such determination if the member produces clear and convincing
evidence that is received by the administrator within forty-five days
after the later of:
(A) The date the member experienced a bona fide separation of
service of all employment as an employee with the district; or
(B) The date the board receives the member's retirement application
or request for distribution as described in subdivision (32) of section
79-978.
(v) A member may appeal the administrator's determination to the
board within thirty days after the determination by the administrator.
The board's determination on appeal shall be final and shall not be
appealable to any court.
(3) In the event a member is entitled to receive a refund of
contributions pursuant to subsection (1) or subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of
this section in an amount greater than one thousand dollars, if the
member does not elect to have the refund paid directly to himself or
herself or transferred to an eligible retirement plan designated by the
member as a direct rollover pursuant to section 79-998, then the refund
of contributions shall be paid in a direct rollover to an individual
retirement plan as designated by the board until September 1, 2024, and
as designated by the retirement board beginning September 1, 2024.
-8-

LB689 LB689
2025 2025
Sec. 3. Original sections 79-930 and 79-992, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-9-